Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB147.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Near Zero Emission Truck Incentive Program Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The purpose of this act is to reduce air pollution from heavy-duty diesel trucks in this Commonwealth.(2) Clean air is necessary for the health and well-being of all Pennsylvanians, and the transportation sector is vital for a functioning supply chain and growing economy.(3) Incentivizing fleets to upgrade their equipment can slash truck emissions in this Commonwealth. A truck sold in 2006 emits roughly 10 times the amount of NOx and particulate 12345678910111213141516171819 matter as a truck sold today.(4) No single technology transfer can affect the Commonwealth's air quality as much as replacing pre-2010 models. The year 2010 marked a major milestone in truck engine technology with the standardization of selective catalytic reduction and diesel particulate filters.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board of Vehicles Act." The act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant." The purchaser of a near zero emission truck from a licensed dealer."Eligible costs." Costs related to offsetting the Federal excise tax on the purchase of a new near zero emission truck in this Commonwealth or an amount equal to the value of 6% of the secondary sale price or $5,000, whichever is greater, on the purchase of a used near zero emission truck in this Commonwealth."Federal excise tax." The Federal excise tax imposed under 26 U.S.C. § 4051 (relating to imposition of tax on heavy trucks and trailers sold at retail)."Fund." The Near Zero Emission Truck Incentive Fund established under section 5."Licensed dealer." A vehicle dealer licensed under the Board of Vehicles Act."Near zero emission truck." A diesel truck manufactured in 20250SB0147PN0094 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2010 or later which meets the emission standards under 40 CFR 86.007-11 (relating to emission standards and supplemental requirements for 2007 and later model year diesel heavy-duty engines and vehicles) on the effective date of this definition."Program." The Near Zero Emission Truck Incentive Program established under section 4."Salvage vehicle." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Truck." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102.Section 4. Near Zero Emission Truck Incentive Program.(a) Establishment.--The Near Zero Emission Truck Incentive Program is established in the department to award grants to eligible applicants on a first-come, first-served basis to the extent that money is available for this purpose. The General Assembly may appropriate additional money to the program for the administrative costs to administer the program and to extend the department's ability to provide grants for the purpose of reducing emissions from diesel trucks in this Commonwealth.(b) Use.--A grant awarded under this section shall be used by the eligible applicant for eligible costs.(c) Criteria and application.--An eligible applicant shall submit an application on a form and in a manner as determined by the department. The following apply:(1) Proof that the near zero emission truck has been registered for at least two years and titled and insured in this Commonwealth must be included in the application.(2) The vehicle identification number of a pre-2010 diesel truck traded-in for a new or used near zero emission truck must be included in the application. The trade-in may not be titled as a salvage vehicle.20250SB0147PN0094 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Limits.--(1) An eligible applicant may receive a grant equal to the amount attributable to the Federal excise tax imposed on the purchase of the newest model year available or the immediate prior model year if there has not been a previous owner.(2) An eligible applicant may receive a grant equal to the value of 6% of the secondary sale price or $5,000, whichever is greater, on the purchase of a used near zero emission truck.(e) Awards.--(1) The department shall award grants for applications made by eligible applicants when sufficient money has been appropriated to the fund.(2) Eligible applicants may apply for a grant under this act for the purchase of a near zero emission truck when the department begins the application process and shall remain eligible to apply for a grant award for a period of two years following the purchase of a near zero emission truck or until funding becomes available.(3) The department shall only award grants for the purchase of a new or used near zero emission truck if accompanied by a trade-in of a pre-2010 diesel truck that is titled, registered and insured in this Commonwealth.(f) Prohibition.--A diesel truck traded in under the program may not be titled or registered again in this Commonwealth unless a waiver has been obtained from the department verifying that an engine manufactured in 2010 or later has been installed. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent a licensed dealer from reselling a pre-2010 diesel truck out of State.20250SB0147PN0094 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Audits.--The department may randomly audit and monitor grant recipients to ensure the appropriate use of grant money and compliance with the provisions of this act and the department's guidelines and regulations.(h) Administrative fee.--The department may use money from the fund to pay for the direct costs associated with the administration of the program.Section 5. Near Zero Emission Truck Incentive Fund.The Near Zero Emission Truck Incentive Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury. Money in the fund shall be appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of awarding grants to eligible applicants under this act. The following shall apply:(1) The interest and income earned on the money in the fund must, after deducting any applicable charges to administer the program, be credited to the fund.(2) Except as otherwise provided, money remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and the balance in the fund must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.(3) Money that is deposited or paid into the fund must be used by the department to carry out the program.Section 6. Duties.The department and the Department of Environmental Protection shall have the following powers and duties:(1) The department, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall establish guidelines or promulgate regulations necessary to implement this act, including standards to prevent pre-2010 diesel trucks traded-in under the program from being titled and registered again 20250SB0147PN0094 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in this Commonwealth under section 4(e)(3).(2) The department shall establish the process through which eligible applicants may apply for grants.(3) The department and the Department of Environmental Protection shall apply for any Federal funding suitable for the purpose of carrying out the program, which shall be deposited into the fund. The department and the Department of Environmental Protection shall request and obtain any waivers from the Federal Highway Administration that are necessary to comply with Federal law and any conditions for Federal money.(4) The department and the Department of Environmental Protection may enter into agreements with third-party entities to carry out the provisions of this act, including, but not limited to, reviewing applications and providing technical assistance.(5) The department shall establish a program web page on its publicly accessible Internet website that includes information such as a summary of available Federal funding opportunities and the status of the progress of the Commonwealth's funding applications.(6) On or before December 31, 2026, and each December 31 thereafter:(i) The department, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives a report summarizing the fiscal activity of the program and the number of vehicles participating.20250SB0147PN0094 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The department shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the House of Representatives a report summarizing the estimated avoided air pollution captured as a result of the program.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0147PN0094 - 7 - 123456789